Oklahoma, session 2026, SB786.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1220, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1220. A. Except as provided in subsection C of this
section, it 1. It shall be unlawful for any operator to knowingly
transport or for any passenger to possess in any moving vehicle upon
a public highway, street, or alley any intoxicating alcoholic
beverage or low-point beer, as defined by Sections 163.1 and 163.2
in Section 1-103 of Title 37 37A of the Oklahoma Statutes, except in
the original container which shall not have been opened and from
which the original cap or seal shall not have been removed, unless
the opened container be is in the rear trunk or rear compartment,
which shall include the spare tire compartment in a station wagon or
panel truck, or any outside compartment which is not accessible to
the driver or any other person in the vehicle while it is in motion.
2. It shall be unlawful to consume marijuana or inhale
secondhand marijuana smoke due to another person’s consumption of
marijuana while operating a motor vehicle on a public highway,

street, or alley. A person operating a motor vehicle on a public
highway, street, or alley shall not possess any open container that
contains marijuana in the passenger area of the motor vehicle.
Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be deemed
guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be punished as
provided in subsection A of Section 566 6-125 of Title 37 37A of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Any person convicted of violating any provision of
subsection A of this section shall, in addition to any fine imposed,
pay a special assessment trauma-care fee of One Hundred Dollars
($100.00) Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) to be deposited into
the Trauma Care Assistance Revolving Fund created in Section 1-2522
1-2530.9 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
C. The provisions of paragraph 1 of subsection A of this
section shall not apply to the passenger area of buses and
limousines; however, it shall be unlawful for the driver of the bus
or limousine to consume or have in the driver’s immediate possession
any intoxicating beverage or low-point beer.
D. No city, town, or county may adopt any order, ordinance,
rule, or regulation concerning the consumption or serving of
intoxicating beverages or low-point beer in buses or limousines.
E. As used in this section:
1. “Bus” means a vehicle as defined in Section 1-105 of Title
47 of the Oklahoma Statutes chartered for transportation of persons
for hire. It shall not mean a school bus, as defined by Section 1-
160 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes, transporting children or a
vehicle operated pursuant to a franchise with a city or town
operating over a regularly scheduled route; and
2. “Limousine” means a chauffeur-driven motor vehicle, other
than a bus or taxicab, as defined by Section 1-174 of Title 47 of
the Oklahoma Statutes, designed and used for transportation of
persons for compensation.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 786 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 17th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 786 Page 3